engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.dic
අකුල/424,2335
අත්පා/31,2699
අනික/6,8,20,36,161,179,1347,3276,4907
අයකළ/123,2235
ඉහිල්/517,2751
උතුර/1,2,5,8,18,20,24,30,32,33,37,109,114,241,3076
එක්ව/2,24,33,41,52,59,80,83,88,109,111,120,122,136,160,170,177,195,209,289,303,304,307,315,327,328,576,578,656,739,766,770,820,964,1034,1335,1394,1479,1500,1628,2283,3870
කටාන/2414,4443,4444
කඩවල/1,18,2224,4176
කරගන/24,678,776,1043,1269,3823,3938
කරයි/11,3713
කලාප/3,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,40,44,48,64,68,71,74,128,129,147,210,237,360,697,851,2778,3191,3734
කසාද/14,27,411,2516,3192
කුහර/2,14,15,19,736,1478
කෙරෙන/6,10,24,37,43,65,73,92,150,192,249,323,396,494,962,1802,2347,3015
කෝරළ/2,3,12,15,19,3940
ගමෙන්/7,3591
ගැටුම/1,2,4,6,8,13,17,21,25,32,101,105,110,156,674,3016
ගැහැට/273,4771
ගෙවූ/15,117,1247
ගොඩනැගී/143,173,620,718,941,1605,3654,3719
ගොඩනැඟී/143,173,419,436,620,683,3666
ජෝර්ජ්/1,10,12,1622,2241
තේරී/7,50,67,69,72,81,143,173,245,365,419,620,653,683,722,1023,1031,1256,1499,2183,3697,4660
දසවන/1048
දෙනා/163,492,1387,1537,1837,2600,3635,3636
දෙපළ/1,4,7,12,392,1239,1821
දේපළ/28,29,1239
නැති/11,13,85,89,142,149,214,429,453,616,673,760,1123,1823,2031,2479,2738
නැතිව/1,3,7,11,16,20,33,41,52,59,83,88,120,160,277,289,303,304,624,720,943,1394,2765,4126
නිවස/1,2,4,6,7,10,17,18,21,25,32,36,53,77,89,133,181,227,313,435,2674,2965,2967,3523
නුවණ/1,4,5,18,1192,2271,4708,4711
නොගෙන/3,7,20,635,1071,2388,2395
නොතිබී/81,131,173,594,717
නොදී/50,67,72,81,131,173,436,553,593,594,682,2212,3720
නොහඳුනන/520
නොහේ/618
පත්තර/2,26,29,199,330,465,528,1170,1214,2451,3431,4371
පළකර/13,33,57,62,88,109,136,155,351,513,950,1279,1879,2234
පළකළ/2,20,2707
පැටවා/1,12,329,2838,3786
පැරදුණ/24,818,4537
පැවැසී/3,7,50,72,173,718,941,3663
පැහැදිල/20,2313
පිපාසය/1,2,4,8,25,1272,3864
පිපිරී/143,365,718,722,1391,1857,2754,2756,3171
පිරික්සා/1603,2840
පිරිහී/7,61,103,645,683,822,1830,3197
පිලිස්සී/7,50,72,143,365
පිහි/3,11,14,15,23,33,48,49,239,278,1602,2052,4723
පුතා/1,5,10,12,35,57,62,95,102,106,134,163,219,375,555,847,1252,1475,2191
පුවත/1,2,4,6,8,17,18,28,36,101,248,314,587,1684,3136,4696
පෘතුගීසි/9,42,84,348,1396,1398,1869,3749
ප්‍රතිපත්ති/3,14,15,19,23,26,29,40,44,55,56,60,68,74,108,121,348,1398
ප්‍රවර්ධන/3,14,19,1149
ප්‍රසාදය/1,4,28,1272,2851
බිළිඳු/9,42,70,577
බුත්තල/1,1624
බුද්ධිමත්/252,310,681,1858,3633
බුලන/1230,4619
බෙනය/2,4,25,898,3831
බේකර්/1,12,97,2245
බෝඩිං/1327,4589
බෝඩ්/196,2814,3820
භටයා/1,95,102,219
මදකම/18,3833
මන්ත්‍රීවරයා/2728
මහත්තය/1,2,5,10,12,13,20,30,35,62,79,106,123,134,193,215,290,433,477,535,716,847,1285,1477,2420,2749
මිරිකී/436
යාන්තමට/137,3840
යොදන/24,37,43,51,53,65,192,282,298,446,551,635,2395,3073,3077,3087
යොමන/24,53,65,3087
රටවල/1,5,6,11,18,22,30,92,101,110,148,156,163,179,325,410,420,687,2885
රාශි/14,15,19,27,40,44,48,55,56,240,324,348,405,1483,2776,3188
රේඛා/10,34,38,39,45,58,66,98,108,151,329,1140
රෝහල/1,2,4,6,8,17,18,21,25,32,101,110,132,156,166,874,2393,3860
ලක්වෙන/4069
ලාස්/2895
ලෙයට/137
වටකර/61,113,513,3581,3680
වතාවට/3,5,13,180,1193,1827
වර්ණ/3,9,14,15,17,23,26,27,31,34,40,48,55,93,124,175,225,343,406,455,831,837,910,980,1155,1900,1908,1990,3011,4759
වැටහී/69,103,388,419,593,594,620,1023,1031,2183
වැළැක්/130,194,1058,1258,2837,3020
විකුණ/13,20,33,57,62,83,88,109,136,155,177,208,211,221,241,268,280,535,610,631,666,720,1429,1484,1540,2506,4741
විදුලිබල/600,3787
විමැසී/69,283,2208
විසඳන/24,37,51,53,298,1267
විසඳා/94,402,756,3824
වෙළෙඳපළ/2,4,25,26,2700,3577
සංග්‍රහ/14,15,19,23,27,48,56,71,255,658,3995,3997
සංවර/3,23,3313,3643
සංසන්දනය/1920
සංස්ලේෂණයට/1827
සදහන/990
සනසන/51,65,512
සමිත/1,20,193,250,745,2544
සැකැසී/50,419
සැනසී/50,67,72,103,173,205,365,653,722,1030,1848
සැලසී/131,1023,1605
සිදුනොකර/155,1879
සිනා/39,58,172,1054,1652,1932,2331,2337,2339,2818,2976,3198,3845,4105,4132,4143,4157
සිහිගන්වන/427
සුහදත්වයකින්/3,946
සෙයා/94,239,1891
ස්ටර්ලිං/489
ස්තර/3,64,2922
ස්ථාන/3,5,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,40,44,48,52,55,56,64,68,71,73,74,94,121,124,128,129,171,210,236,237,255,266,324,360,379,467,604,697,850,907,960,1187,1188,1317,3186,3568,4014,4015,4017,4307,4656
හටගත/6,16,316,418,447,569,795,1194,1412,2282
ෆවුස්/1914
